test/src/morphology/N-seenj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - sēņ: # Noun 220 'eng /est seen/fin' - full paradigm
     sēņ+N+Sg+Nom: sēņ
     sēņ+N+Sg+Gen: sīen
     sēņ+N+Sg+Par: sīentõ
     sēņ+N+Sg+Dat: sīenõn
     sēņ+N+Sg+Ins: sīenkõks
     sēņ+N+Sg+Ill: sīenõ
     sēņ+N+Sg+Ela: sīenstõ
     sēņ+N+Pl+Nom: sīend
     sēņ+N+Pl+Gen: sīend
     sēņ+N+Pl+Par: sēņi
     sēņ+N+Pl+Dat: sīendõn
     sēņ+N+Pl+Ins: sīendkõks
     sēņ+N+Pl+Ill: sēņiž
     sēņ+N+Pl+Ela: sēņšti
